Utah statutes.
31A-22-614.6.   Health care delivery and payment reform demonstration projects.

(1)  The Legislature finds that:

(a)  current health care delivery and payment systems do not provide systemwide aligned incentives for the appropriate delivery of health care;

(b)  some health care providers and health care payers have developed ideas for health care delivery and payment system reform, but lack the critical number of patient lives and payer involvement to accomplish systemwide reform; and

(c)  there is a compelling state interest to encourage health care providers and health care payers to join together and coordinate efforts at systemwide health care delivery and payment reform.

(2) (a)  The Department of Health may convene meetings of health care providers and health care payers for the purpose of coordinating broad based demonstration projects for health care delivery and payment reform.

(b) (i)  The speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a person who is a member of the House of Representatives, or from the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, to attend the meetings convened under Subsection (2)(a).

(ii)  The president of the Senate may appoint a person who is a senator, or from the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, to attend the meetings convened under Subsection (2)(a).

(c)  Participation in the coordination efforts by health care providers and health care payers is voluntary, but is encouraged.

(3)  The commissioner and the Department of Health may facilitate several coordinated broad based demonstration projects for health care delivery reform and health care payment reform between one or more health care providers and one or more health care payers who elect to participate in the demonstration projects by:

(a)  consulting with health care providers and health care payers who elect to join together in a broad based reform demonstration project;

(b)  consulting with a neutral, non-biased third party with an established record for broad based, multi-payer and multi-provider quality assurance efforts and data collection;

(c)  applying for grants and assistance that may be available for creating and implementing the demonstration projects; and

(d)  adopting administrative rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, as necessary to develop, oversee, and implement the demonstration projects.

(4)  The Department of Health and the commissioner shall report to the Health System Reform Task Force by October 2011, and to the Legislature's Business and Labor Interim Committee every October thereafter regarding the progress towards coordination of broad based health care system payment and delivery reform.

